Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2954
Violation of Animal Health and Disease Control Act or Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act; orders of department; arrests; law enforcement officer; county attorney; powers and duties.

(1) For purposes of this section, law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 54-902. Special investigator means a special investigator appointed as a deputy state sheriff and employed by the department for state law enforcement purposes pursuant to section 81-201.

(2) The department or any officer, special investigator, agent, employee, or appointee thereof may request any law enforcement officer to execute the orders of the department, and such law enforcement officer shall have authority to execute the orders of the department.

(3) Any special investigator, or any law enforcement officer whose assistance is requested pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, may arrest any person found violating the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under such acts, and such officer or special investigator shall immediately notify the county attorney of such arrest. The county attorney shall prosecute the arrested person according to the law.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 54.
November 14, 2020
Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.